Massachusetts, session 194th, H4182.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority 
of the same, as follows: 
 
Notwithstanding any general or special law to the contrary, Massachusetts Department of 
Transportation shall establish a sick leave bank for Jato Charlotin, an employee of the 
Massachusetts Department of Transportation. Any employee of the Massachusetts Department of 
Transportation may voluntarily contribute 1 or more sick, personal or vacation days to the sick 
leave bank for use by Jato Charlotin. If Jato Charlotin terminates employment with the 
Massachusetts Department of Transportation or requests to dissolve the sick leave bank, any 
remaining time in the sick leave bank shall be transferred to the extended illness leave bank. Sick 
leave bank days shall not be used for absences unrelated to the illness or disability that 

of 2 9 necessitated the establishment of the sick leave bank as determined by the Massachusetts 
Department of Transportation.